Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202653-103.47
Bottle club, defined.

Bottle club means an operation, whether formally organized as a club having a regular membership list, dues, officers, and meetings or not, keeping and maintaining premises where persons who have made their own purchases of alcoholic liquor congregate to consume alcoholic liquor in or upon the premises upon the payment of a fee or other consideration.

Laws 2018, LB1120, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB1235, § 1.
July 18, 2026